New York, session 2025-2026, S5468.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 47 to read as follows: 3 (47) Fire extinguishers, fire alarms, heat alarms or carbon monoxide 4 alarms purchased for residential use during the month of October. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law and shall apply to eligible fire extinguishers, fire 7 alarms, heat alarms and carbon monoxide alarms purchased on or after 8 such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09131-01-5